Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1612
Contributions by employees; payroll deductions.

All contributions by employees under sections 84-1601 to 84-1615 shall be made by payroll deductions. As each new employee becomes eligible for coverage under sections 84-1601 to 84-1615, the Director of Administrative Services shall certify the amount to be deducted each pay period from the employee's pay under sections 84-1601 to 84-1615. When there is any change in the amount of required contribution, such change shall be similarly certified. Such amount shall be deducted each pay period by the director.

Laws 1973, LB 516, § 10;

Laws 1987, LB 491, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 44-1629.